Virginia statutes. Title 40.1. Labor and Employment.
Article 1. In General.

§ 40.1-51.5.
Short title; definitions.

As used in this chapter, which may be cited as the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Safety Act, the following terms shall have the meanings set forth in this section unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Boiler” means a closed vessel in which water is heated, steam is generated, steam is superheated, or any combination thereof, under pressure or vacuum for use externally to itself by the direct application of heat from the combustion of fuels, or from electricity or nuclear energy. The term “boiler” shall include fired units for heating or vaporizing liquids other than water where these units are separate from processing systems and are complete within themselves.

“Power boiler” means a boiler in which steam or other vapor is generated at a pressure of more than fifteen pounds per square inch gauge pressure.

“High pressure, high temperature water boiler” means a water boiler operating at pressures exceeding 160 pounds per square inch gauge pressure or temperatures exceeding 250° Fahrenheit.

“Heating boiler” means a steam or vapor boiler operating at pressures not exceeding 15 pounds per square inch gauge pressure, or a hot water boiler operating at pressures not exceeding 160 pounds per square inch gauge pressure or temperature not exceeding 250° Fahrenheit.

“Unfired pressure vessel” means a vessel in which the pressure is obtained from an external source or by the application of heat from an indirect source or from a direct source, other than those vessels defined in subdivision (a) of this section.

“Certificate inspection” means an inspection, the report of which is used by the Chief Inspector to decide whether or not a certificate as provided by §

40.1-51.10

may be issued. This certificate inspection shall be an internal inspection when construction permits; otherwise, it shall be as complete an inspection as possible.

“Board” means the Safety and Health Codes Board.

“Owner-user inspection agency” means any person, firm, partnership or corporation registered with the Chief Inspector and approved by the Board as being legally responsible for inspecting pressure vessels which they operate in Virginia.

“Examining Board” means persons appointed by the Chief Inspector to monitor examinations of inspectors.

“Water heater” means a vessel used to supply (i) potable hot water or (ii) both space heat and potable water in combination which is directly heated by the combustion of fuels, by electricity or any other source and withdrawn for use external to the system at pressures not to exceed 160 pounds per square inch, or temperatures of 210° Fahrenheit.

“Contract fee inspector” means any certified boiler inspector contracted to inspect boilers or pressure vessels on an independent basis by the owner or operator of the boiler or pressure vessel.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1974, c. 195; 1986, c. 211; 1993, c. 543; 1996, c. 294.

The numbers of §§

40.1-51.5

through

40.1-51.19

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 1972 act having been

40.1-51.1

through

40.1-51.14

.

Cross references.

As to ordinances certifying boiler and pressure vessel operators, see §

15.2-910

.

§ 40.1-51.6.
Safety and Health Codes Board to formulate rules, regulations, etc.; cost of administration.

The Board is authorized to formulate definitions, rules, regulations and standards which shall be designed for the protection of human life and property from the unsafe or dangerous construction, installation, inspection, operation, maintenance and repair of boilers and pressure vessels in this Commonwealth.In promulgating such rules, regulations and standards, the Board shall consider any or all of the following:

Standards, formulae and practices generally accepted by recognized engineering and safety authorities and bodies.

Previous experiences based upon inspections, performance, maintenance and operation.

Location of the boiler or pressure vessel relative to persons.

Provisions for operational controls and safety devices.

Interrelation between other operations outside the scope of this chapter and those covered by this chapter.

Level of competency required of persons installing, constructing, maintaining or operating any equipment covered under this chapter or auxiliary equipment.

Federal laws, rules, regulations and standards.

The Commissioner shall ensure that the costs of administering this chapter shall not exceed revenues generated from fees collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1973, c. 425; 1985, c. 40.

§ 40.1-51.7.
Installations, repairs and alterations to conform to rules and regulations; existing installations.

No boiler or pressure vessel which does not conform to the rules and regulations of the Board governing new construction and installation and which has been certified by the Board shall be installed or operated in this Commonwealth after twelve months from July 1, 1973. Prior to such date no boiler or pressure vessel shall be installed and operated unless it is in conformity with the rules and regulations established pursuant to this chapter which were in existence on July 1, 1972.

This chapter shall not be construed as in any way preventing the use, sale or reinstallation of a boiler or pressure vessel constructed prior to July 1, 1972, provided it has been made to conform to the rules and regulations of the Board governing existing installations prior to its reinstallation or operation.

Repairs and alterations shall conform to the rules and regulations set forth by the Board.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1974, c. 195; 1986, c. 211.

§ 40.1-51.8.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any of the following:

Boilers or unfired pressure vessels owned or operated by the federal government or any agency thereof;

Boilers or fired or unfired pressure vessels used in or on the property of private residences or apartment houses of less than four apartments;

Boilers of railroad companies maintained on railborne vehicles or those used to propel waterborne vessels;

Hobby or model boilers as defined in §

40.1-51.19:1

;

Hot water supply boilers, water heaters, and unfired pressure vessels used as hot water supply storage tanks heated by steam or any other indirect means when the following limitations are not exceeded:

A heat input of 200,000 British thermal units per hour;

A water temperature of 210° Fahrenheit;

A water-containing capacity of 120 gallons;

Unfired pressure vessels containing air only which are located on vehicles or vessels designed and used primarily for transporting passengers or freight;

Unfired pressure vessels containing air only, installed on the right-of-way of railroads and used directly in the operation of trains;

Unfired pressure vessels used for containing water under pressure when either of the following are not exceeded:

Unfired pressure vessels containing water in combination with air pressure, the compression of which serves only as a cushion, that do not exceed:

Unfired pressure vessels containing air only, providing the volume does not exceed eight cubic feet nor the operating pressure is not greater than 175 pounds;

Unfired pressure vessels having an operating pressure not exceeding fifteen pounds with no limitation on size;

Pressure vessels that do not exceed:

Pressure vessels used for transportation or storage of compressed gases when constructed in compliance with the specifications of the United States Department of Transportation and when charged with gas marked, maintained, and periodically requalified for use, as required by appropriate regulations of the United States Department of Transportation;

Stationary American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) LP-Gas containers used exclusively in propane service with a capacity that does not exceed 2,000 gallons if the owner of the container or the owner’s servicing agent:

Unfired pressure vessels used in and as a part of electric substations owned or operated by an electric utility, provided such electric substation is enclosed, locked, and inaccessible to the public; or

Coil type hot water boilers without any steam space where water flashes into steam when released through a manually operated nozzle, unless steam is generated within the coil or unless one of the following limitations is exceeded:

a.

A design pressure of 300 psi; or

b.

A design temperature of 210° Fahrenheit;

a.

A design pressure of 300 psi;

b.

A design temperature of 210° Fahrenheit; or

c.

A water-containing capacity of 120 gallons;

a.

Five cubic feet in volume and 250 pounds per square inch gauge pressure;

b.

One and one-half cubic feet in volume and 600 pounds per square inch gauge pressure; and

c.

An inside diameter of six inches with no limitations on gauge pressure;

a.

Conducts an inspection of the container not less frequently than every five years, in which all visible parts of the container, including insulation or coating, structural attachments, and vessel connections, are inspected for corrosion, distortion, cracking, evidence of leakage, fire damage, or other condition indicating impairment;

b.

Maintains a record of the most recent inspection of the container conducted in accordance with subdivision a; and

c.

Makes the records required to be maintained in accordance with subdivision b available for inspection by the Commissioner;

a.

Three-fourths inch diameter tubing or pipe size with no drums or headers attached;

b.

Nominal water containing capacity not exceeding six gallons; and

c.

Water temperature not exceeding 350° Fahrenheit.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1977, c. 301; 1978, c. 355; 1986, c. 211; 1988, c. 289; 1990, c. 226; 1993, c. 543; 1999, c. 335; 2000, c. 898; 2012, c. 332; 2013, c. 171.

The 1999 amendment,

effective July 1, 2000, substituted “article” for “chapter” in the introductory language, added subdivision 4, and renumbered former subdivisions 4 through 14 as 5 through 15.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 898 substituted “Hobby” for “Antique” in subdivision 4.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 332 deleted “all others shall be used in accordance with Chapter 7 (§

27-86

et seq.) of Title 27” at the end of subdivision 13, added present subdivision 14, and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 171 inserted “or on the property of” in subdivision 2; and in the introductory paragraph of subdivision 14, substituted “Stationary American Society of Mechanical Engineers” for “Until July 1, 2013, qualified stationary American Society of Mechanical Engineers” and added “with a capacity that does not exceed 2,000 gallons if the owner of the container or the owner’s servicing agent” at the end and added subdivisions 14 a through 14 c.

§ 40.1-51.9.
Employment and appointment of inspectors and other personnel; inspections; reports.

The Commissioner is authorized to employ persons to enforce the provisions of this chapter and the regulations of the Board. He shall be authorized to require examinations or other information which he deems necessary to aid him in determining the fitness, competency, and professional or technical expertise of any applicant to perform the duties and tasks to be assigned.

The Commissioner is authorized to appoint a Chief Inspector and to certify special inspectors who shall meet all qualifications set forth by the Commissioner and the Board. Special inspectors shall be authorized to inspect specified premises and without cost or expense to the Commonwealth. Reports of all violations of the regulations or of this chapter shall be immediately made to the Commissioner. Other reports shall be made as required by the Commissioner.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1974, c. 195; 1995, c. 97.

§ 40.1-51.9:1.
Examination of inspectors; certificate of competency required.

All applicants for the position of inspector authorized by §

40.1-51.9

shall be required to have successfully completed an examination monitored by the Examining Board and to have received a certificate of competency from the Commissioner prior to commencing their duties. A fee as set under subsection A of §

40.1-51.15

shall be charged each applicant taking the inspector’s examination.

Each inspector holding a valid certificate of competency and who conducts inspections, as provided by this chapter, shall be required to obtain an identification card biennially, not later than June 30 of the year in which the identification card is required. Application for the identification card shall be made on forms furnished by the Department upon request. Each application shall be submitted to the Department, accompanied by a post-office money order or check drawn to the order of the Treasurer of Virginia in the amount as set under subsection A of §

40.1-51.15

.

History.

1974, c. 195; 1986, c. 266; 1997, c. 212.

§ 40.1-51.9:2.
Financial responsibility requirements for contract fee inspectors.

Contract fee inspectors inspecting or certifying regulated boilers or pressure vessels in the Commonwealth shall maintain evidence of their financial responsibility, including compensation to third parties, for bodily injury and property damage resulting from, or directly relating to, an inspector’s negligent inspection or recommendation for certification of a boiler or pressure vessel.

Documentation of financial responsibility, including documentation of insurance or bond, shall be provided to the Chief Inspector within thirty days after certification of the inspector. The Chief Inspector may revoke an inspector’s certification for failure to provide documentation of financial responsibility in a timely fashion.

The Safety and Health Codes Board is authorized to promulgate regulations requiring contract fee inspectors, as a condition of their doing business in the Commonwealth, to demonstrate financial responsibility sufficient to comply with the requirements of this chapter. Regulations governing the amount of any financial responsibility required by the contract fee inspector shall take into consideration the type, capacity and number of boilers or pressure vessels inspected or certified.

Financial responsibility may be demonstrated by self-insurance, insurance, guaranty or surety, or any other method approved by the Board, or any combination thereof, under the terms the Board may prescribe. A contract fee inspector whose financial responsibility is accepted by the Board under this subsection shall notify the Chief Inspector at least thirty days before the effective date of the change, expiration, or cancellation of any instrument of insurance, guaranty or surety.

Acceptance of proof of financial responsibility shall expire on the effective date of any change in the inspector’s instrument of insurance, guaranty or surety, or the expiration date of the inspector’s certification. Application for renewal of acceptance of proof of financial responsibility shall be filed thirty days before the date of expiration.

The Chief Inspector, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may revoke his acceptance of evidence of financial responsibility if he determines that acceptance has been procured by fraud or misrepresentation, or a change in circumstances has occurred that would warrant denial of acceptance of evidence of financial responsibility under this section or the requirements established by the Board pursuant to this section.

It is not a defense to any action brought for failure to comply with the requirement to provide acceptable evidence of financial responsibility that the person charged believed in good faith that the owner or operator of an inspected boiler or pressure vessel possessed evidence of financial responsibility accepted by the Chief Inspector or the Board.

History.

1996, c. 294.

§ 40.1-51.10.
Right of access to premises; certification and recertification; inspection requirements.

The Commissioner, his agents or special inspectors shall have free access, during reasonable hours to any premises in the Commonwealth where a boiler or pressure vessel is being constructed, operated or maintained, or is being installed to conduct a variance review, an owner-user inspection agency audit, an emergency repair review, an accident investigation, a violation follow-up, and a secondhand or used boiler review for the purpose of ascertaining whether such boiler or pressure vessel is being constructed, operated or maintained in accordance with this chapter.

On and after January 1, 1973, no boiler or pressure vessel used or proposed to be used within this Commonwealth, except boilers or pressure vessels exempted by this chapter, shall be installed, operated or maintained unless it has been inspected by the Commissioner, his agents or special inspectors as to construction, installation and condition and shall be certified. A fee as set under subsection A of §

40.1-51.15

shall be charged for each inspection certificate issued. In lieu of such fees both for certification and recertification, an authorized owner-user inspection agency shall be charged annual filing fees as set under subsection A of §

40.1-51.15

.

Recertification shall be required as follows:

Power boilers and high pressure, high temperature water boilers shall receive a certificate inspection annually and shall also be externally inspected annually while under pressure if possible;

Heating boilers shall receive a certificate inspection biennially;

Pressure vessels subject to internal corrosion shall receive a certificate inspection biennially;

Pressure vessels not subject to internal corrosion shall receive a certificate inspection at intervals set by the Board, but internal inspection shall not be required of pressure vessels, the content of which are known to be noncorrosive to the material of which the shell, heads or fittings are constructed, either from the chemical composition of the contents or from evidence that the contents are adequately treated with a corrosion inhibitor, provided that such vessels are constructed in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Board;

Nuclear vessels within the scope of this chapter shall be inspected and reported in such form and with such appropriate information as the Board shall designate;

A grace period of two months beyond the periods specified in subdivisions 1, 2, 3 and 4 of this subsection may elapse between certificate inspections. The Chief Inspector may extend a certificate for up to three additional months beyond such grace period subject to a satisfactory external inspection of the object and receipt of a fee as set under subsection A of §

40.1-51.15

for each month of inspection beyond the grace period.

Inspection requirements for operating equipment shall be in accordance with generally accepted practice and compatible with the actual service conditions and shall include but not be limited to the following criteria:

Previous experience, based on records of inspection, performance and maintenance;

Location, with respect to personnel hazard;

Qualifications and competency of inspection and operating personnel;

Provision for related safe operation controls; and

Interrelation with other operations outside of the scope of this chapter.

Based upon documentation of such actual service conditions by the owner or user of the operating equipment, the Board may, in its discretion, permit variations in the inspection requirements as provided in this section.

If, at the discretion of the Commissioner, a hydrostatic test shall be deemed necessary, it shall be made by the owner or user of the boiler or pressure vessel.

All boilers, other than cast iron sectional boilers, and pressure vessels to be installed in this Commonwealth after the six-month period from the date upon which the rules and regulations of the Board shall become effective shall be inspected during construction as required by the applicable rules and regulations of the Board.

Ninety-one days after expiration of a certificate for any boiler or pressure vessel subject to this section, the Commissioner may assign an agent or special inspector to inspect such boiler or pressure vessel, and its owner or operator shall be assessed a fee for such inspection. The fee shall be established in accordance with subsection A of §

40.1-51.15

.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1974, c. 195; 1976, c. 288; 1986, c. 266; 1988, c. 289; 1992, c. 3; 1993, c. 544; 1995, c. 97; 1997, c. 212; 2005, c. 387.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 387 added subsection H.

§ 40.1-51.10:1.
Issuance of certificates; charges.

The Commissioner may designate special inspectors and contract fee inspectors to issue inspection certificates for boilers and pressure vessels they have inspected. If no defects are found or when the boiler or pressure vessel has been corrected in accordance with regulations, the designated special inspector or contract fee inspector shall issue a certificate on forms furnished by the Department. The designated special inspector or contract fee inspector shall collect the inspection certificate fee required under §

40.1-51.10

at the time of the issuance of the certificate and forward the fee and a duplicate of the certificate to the chief inspector immediately.

Each designated special inspector or contract fee inspector may charge a fee as set under subsection A of §

40.1-51.15

for each certificate issued, but the charge shall not be mandatory. No charge shall be made unless the inspector has previously contracted therefor.

History.

1997, c. 212.

§ 40.1-51.11.
Suspension of inspection certificate; injunctive relief.

The Commissioner or his authorized representative may at any time suspend an inspection certificate when, in his opinion, the boiler or pressure vessel for which it was issued, cannot be operated without menace to the public safety, or when the boiler or pressure vessel is found not to comply with the rules and regulations herein provided. Each suspension of an inspection certificate shall continue in effect until such boiler or pressure vessel shall have been made to conform to the rules and regulations of the Board, and until such inspection certificate shall have been reinstated. No boiler or pressure vessel shall be operated during the period of suspension.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, in the event of violation of any provision of this chapter or the regulations promulgated thereunder, the Board or the Commissioner may petition any appropriate court of record for relief by injunction, without being compelled to allege or prove that an adequate remedy at law does not exist.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1981, c. 39; 2000, c. 728.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 728 substituted subsection designations “A” and “B” for “(a)” and “(b)” and rewrote subsection B.

§ 40.1-51.11:1.
Owner-user inspection agencies.

Any person, firm, partnership or corporation operating pressure vessels in this Commonwealth may seek approval and registration as an owner-user inspection agency by filing an application with the chief inspector on forms prescribed and available from the Department, and request approval by the Board. Each application shall be accompanied by a fee as set under subsection A of §

40.1-51.15

and a bond in the penal sum of $5,000 which shall continue to be valid during the time the approval and registration of the company as an owner-user inspection agency is in effect. Applicants meeting the requirements of the rules and regulations for approval as owner-user inspection agencies will be approved and registered by the Board. The Board shall withdraw the approval and registration as an owner-user inspection agency of any person, firm, partnership or corporation which fails to comply with all rules and regulations applicable to owner-user inspection agencies. Each owner-user inspection agency shall file an annual statement as required by the rules and regulations, accompanied by a filing fee as set under subsection A of §

40.1-51.15

.

History.

1974, c. 195; 1986, c. 266; 1997, c. 212.

§ 40.1-51.12.
Violation for operating boiler or pressure vessel without inspection certificate; civil penalty.

After twelve months following July 1, 1972, it shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership or corporation to operate in this Commonwealth a boiler or pressure vessel without a valid inspection certificate. Any owner, user, operator or agent of any such person who actually operates or is responsible for operating such boiler or pressure vessel thereof who operates a boiler or pressure vessel without such inspection certificate, or at a pressure exceeding that specified in such inspection certificate shall be in violation of this section and subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $100. Each day of such violation shall be deemed a separate offense.

All procedural rights guaranteed to employers pursuant to §

40.1-49.4

shall apply to penalties under this section.

Investigation and enforcement for violations of this section shall be carried out by the Department of Labor and Industry. Civil penalties imposed for violations of this section shall be paid into the general fund.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1995, c. 97.

§ 40.1-51.13.
Posting of certificate.

Certificates shall be posted in the room containing the boiler or pressure vessel inspected.
If the boiler or pressure vessel is not located within the building the certificate shall be posted in a location convenient to the boiler or pressure vessel inspected, or in any place where it will be accessible to interested parties.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1990, c. 226.

§ 40.1-51.14.
When inspection certificate for insured boiler or pressure vessel invalid.

No inspection certificate issued for an insured boiler or pressure vessel based upon a report of a special inspector shall be valid after the boiler or pressure vessel for which it was issued shall cease to be insured by a company duly authorized to issue policies of insurance in this Commonwealth.

History.

1972, c. 237.

§ 40.1-51.15.
Fees.

The Safety and Health Codes Board shall establish fees required under this chapter. Following the close of any biennium, when the account for the Safety and Health Codes Board shows expenses allocated to it for the past biennium to be more than ten percent greater or less than moneys collected on behalf of the Board, it shall revise the fees levied by it for licensure and renewal thereof so that the fees are sufficient but not excessive to cover expenses. Such revisions, and the underlying rationale, shall be included in the Department’s Annual Report submitted pursuant to §

40.1-4.1

.

The owner or user of a boiler or pressure vessel required by this chapter to be reviewed shall pay directly to the Commissioner, upon completion of inspection, fees in accordance with the following schedule:

Conducting or participating in reviews and surveys of boiler or pressure vessel manufacturers or repair organizations for the purpose of national accreditation, shall be charged a fee as set under subsection A per review or survey.

All other inspections, including variance reviews, emergency repair reviews, and reviews of secondhand or used boilers or pressure vessels made by the Commissioner or his appointed representative shall be charged a fee as set under subsection A.

“Secondhand” shall mean an object which has changed ownership and location after primary use.

The Commissioner shall transfer all fees so received to the State Treasurer for deposit into the general fund of the state treasury.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1985, c. 40; 1986, c. 266; 1988, c. 289; 1993, c. 544; 1995, c. 97; 1997, c. 212.

§ 40.1-51.15:1.
Only one inspection necessary.

Inspection under the provisions of this chapter shall constitute compliance with and shall be in lieu of any boiler or pressure vessel inspection required by Chapter 6 (§

36-97

et seq.) of Title 36.

History.

1980, c. 464; 1992, c. 3.

§ 40.1-51.16.
Appeals.

Any person aggrieved by an order or an act of the Board or Commissioner under this chapter may appeal such order or act to the Board pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). Final orders of the Board may be appealed pursuant to the Administrative Process Act.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1986, c. 615; 1988, c. 289.

§ 40.1-51.17.
Effect of chapter on local ordinances and regulations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as repealing any valid local ordinance or regulation now in effect adopted pursuant to general law or charter provision; provided, however, that if any such ordinance or regulation is less strict than any standard rule or regulation promulgated or adopted by the Board, then such ordinance or regulation shall be superseded by the applicable standard or regulation of the Board except as provided in §

40.1-51.19

.

History.

1972, c. 237.

§ 40.1-51.18.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

40.1-51.18

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1972, c. 237.

§ 40.1-51.19.
Variances.

Upon application pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (9) of §

40.1-6

, the Commissioner may allow variances from a specific regulation provided the applicant proves by clear and convincing evidence his boiler or pressure vessel meets substantially equivalent operating criteria and standards.

History.

1972, c. 237; 1990, c. 226.